Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2068.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; Woolford Road extension The sum of $6,500,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to distribute to the city of Show Low for the Woolford Road extension project.